Washington statutes.
RCW 19.130.040

Certain radio equipment—Application of chapter.

This chapter shall not apply to radio equipment used for land, marine, or air mobile service, or any like service, whether or not such equipment is capable of interconnection by manual or automatic means to a telephone line.

[ 1984 c 275 s 4.]